Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-423
Preliminary expenses; payment.

The board of directors shall, out of the first money on hand, pay all the expenses of organization, of the county surveyor and county clerk, and other expenses.

Laws 1907, c. 153, § 17, p. 482;

R.S.1913, § 1887;

C.S.1922, § 1835;

C.S.1929, § 31-523;

R.S.1943, § 31-423.